Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 2 Georgia Crime Information Center

Cross references.

Records checks for employees of personal care homes, § 31-7-250 et seq.

Records checks for applicants for employment with Department of Human Resources or health agencies, §

49-2-14

.

Records checks for employees of day-care centers, §

49-5-60

et seq.

Records checks for persons exercising supervisory or disciplinary power over children, §

49-5-110

et seq.

Notification to Department of Corrections, Uniform Superior Court Rules, Rule 35.1.

Filing requirements in criminal cases, Uniform Superior Court Rules, Rule 36.13.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Organization, practices, and procedures of the Georgia Crime Information Center, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Crime Information Center Council, Chapters 140-1 and 140-2.

Law reviews.

For article, “Georgia’s Open Records and Open Meetings Laws: A Continued March Toward Government in the Sunshine,” see 40 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (1988).

For note, “Give It to Me, I’m Worth It:
The Need to Amend Georgia’s Record Restriction Statute to Provide Ex-Offenders with a Second Chance in the Employment Sector,” see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 267 (2017).

35-3-30.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Career criminal” means any person who has been previously convicted three times under the laws of this state of felonies or under the laws of any other state or the United States of crimes which would be felonies if committed within this state.

(1.1)

“Center” means the Georgia Crime Information Center.

“Council” means the Georgia Crime Information Center Council.

“Criminal justice agencies” means those public agencies at all levels of government which perform as their principal function activities relating to the apprehension, prosecution, adjudication, or rehabilitation of criminal offenders.

“Criminal justice information” means the following classes of information:

“Criminal history record information” means information collected by criminal justice agencies on individuals consisting of identifiable descriptions and notations of arrests, detentions, indictments, accusations, information, or other formal charges, and any disposition arising therefrom, sentencing, correctional supervision, and release. Such term also includes the age and sex of each victim as provided by criminal justice agencies. The term does not include identification information, such as fingerprint records, to the extent that such information does not indicate involvement of the individual in the criminal justice system.

“Restricted data” means data which contains information relating to data-gathering techniques, distribution methods, manuals, and forms.

“Secret data” means data which includes information dealing with those operational and programming elements which prevent unlawful intrusion into the Georgia Crime Information Center/Criminal Justice Information System computer system, the communications network, and satellite computer systems handling criminal justice information.

“Sensitive data” means data which contains statistical information in the form of reports, lists, and documentation, which information may identify a group characteristic. It may apply to groups of persons, articles, vehicles, etc., such as white males or stolen guns.

“Criminal justice information system” means all those agencies, procedures, mechanisms, media, and forms, as well as the information itself, which are or which become involved in the origination, transmittal, storage, retrieval, and dissemination of information related to reported offenses, offenders, and the subsequent actions related to such events or persons.

“Law enforcement agency” means a governmental unit of one or more persons employed full time or part time by the state, a state agency or department, or a political subdivision of the state for the purpose of preventing and detecting crime and enforcing state laws or local ordinances, employees of which unit are authorized to make arrests for crimes while acting within the scope of their authority.

“Offense” means an act which is a felony, a misdemeanor, or a violation of a county or municipal ordinance.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1301, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 617, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 952, §§ 1, 3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 35; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 35; Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 23/HB 1059.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 30(c)/HB 1059, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The provisions of this Act shall not affect or abate the status as a crime of any such act or omission which occurred prior to the effective date of the Act repealing, repealing and reenacting, or amending such law, nor shall the prosecution of such crime be abated as a result of such repeal, repeal and reenactment, or amendment.”

Law reviews.

For comment, “Confidentiality and Dissemination of Personal Information: An Examination of State Laws Governing Data Protection,” see 41 Emory L.J. 1185 (1992).

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 11 (2006).

35-3-31.
Establishment of center; staff and equipment generally; State Personnel Board status of personnel.

There is established for the state, within the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, a system for the intrastate communication of vital information relating to crimes, criminals, and criminal activity, to be known as the Georgia Crime Information Center.

Central responsibility for the development, maintenance, and operation of the center shall be vested with the director of the center with the assistance and guidance of the Georgia Crime Information Council, the establishment of which is provided for in Code Section 35-3-32.

The director of the center shall maintain the necessary staff along with support services to be procured within the Georgia state government, such as computer services from the Department of Administrative Services, physical space and logistic support from the Department of Public Safety, and other services or sources as necessary, to enable the effective and efficient performance of the duties and responsibilities ascribed to the center in this article.

All personnel of the center shall be administered according to appropriate special and standard schedules issued pursuant to the rules of the State Personnel Board with due recognition to be given by the latter to the special qualifications and availability of the types of individuals required in such an agency.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1301, § 2; Ga. L. 1974, p. 109, § 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 617, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-53/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

35-3-32.
Establishment of council; composition; duties and responsibilities of council generally.

There is created the Georgia Crime Information Center Council.

The duties and responsibilities of the council are to:

Advise and assist in the establishment of policies under which the center is to be operated;

Advise and assist in updating the policies under which the center is to be operated, to the extent that such policies are necessary to comply with the uniform standards promulgated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection (h) of Code Section 15-6-50.3 issued by The Council of Superior Court Clerks of Georgia;

Ensure that the information obtained pursuant to this article shall be restricted to the items specified in this article and ensure that the center is administered so as not to accumulate any information or distribute any information that is not specifically approved in this article;

Ensure that adequate security safeguards are incorporated so that the data available through this system is used only by properly authorized persons and agencies;

Establish appropriate disciplinary measures to be taken by the center in the instance of violations of data reporting or dissemination of laws, rules, and regulations by criminal justice agencies or members thereof covered by this article; and

Establish other policies which provide for the efficient and effective use and operation of the center under the limitations imposed by the terms of this article.

The members of the board shall serve ex officio as members of the council and shall constitute the council.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1301, § 5; Ga. L. 1976, p. 617, § 7; Ga. L. 1979, p. 613, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 12/SB 441.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added paragraph (b)(2), and redesignated former paragraphs (b)(2) through (b)(5) as present paragraphs (b)(3) through (b)(6), respectively.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 1/SB 441, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) The state’s current system for sharing criminal case data is not adequate to provide to all appropriately interested parties, including, but not limited to, law enforcement agencies and officers, courts, crime victims and other impacted individuals, housing providers, and employers, complete criminal case data;

“(2) One recent report indicates there may be as many as 7 million criminal charges without a final disposition indicated, and, of those, as many as 5.4 million criminal charges have languished for years;

“(3) Georgia’s citizens and businesses are harmed by incomplete criminal case data. For example, in thousands of cases, as a result of incomplete criminal case data, citizens’ employability and housing opportunities have been negatively impacted; and

“(4) A more uniform, modern system and framework for handling criminal case data will support the state in meeting its obligations to victims to keep them informed as their perpetrators make their way through the criminal justice system.

“(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that criminal case data be complete and accurately reported to the appropriate state data base and be accessible to state and local criminal justice agencies, employers, housing providers, victims, and all citizens.”

Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 2/SB 441, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Criminal Records Responsibility Act.’”

35-3-33.
Powers and duties of center generally.

The center shall:

Obtain and file fingerprints, descriptions, photographs, and any other pertinent identifying data on persons who:

Have been or are hereafter arrested or taken into custody in this state:

For an offense which is a felony;

For an offense which is a misdemeanor or a violation of an ordinance involving burglary tools, commercial gambling, dealing in gambling devices, contributing to the delinquency of a child, dealing in stolen property, dangerous drugs, marijuana, narcotics, firearms, dangerous weapons, explosives, pandering, prostitution, sexual offenses where children are victims, or worthless checks;

For an offense charged as disorderly conduct but which relates to an act connected with one or more of the offenses under division (ii) of this subparagraph;

As a fugitive from justice; or

For any other offense designated by the Attorney General;

Are or become career criminals, well-known offenders, or habitual offenders;

Are currently or become confined to any prison, penitentiary, or other penal institution;

Are unidentified human corpses found in this state;

Are children who are charged with an offense that if committed by an adult would be a felony or are children whose cases are transferred from a juvenile court to another court for prosecution; or

Are individuals for whom fingerprint based criminal history checks are authorized by this state’s or federal law for the purpose of determining suitability or fitness for employment, placement, registration, a permit, or a license for an agency or qualified entity which is participating in the federal program that allows an ongoing and continuing review of such individual’s criminal history; provided, however, that such fingerprints shall be retained and maintained securely and separately from records relating to the identification of criminals, and provided, further, that the center shall not file or retain fingerprints submitted for the purpose of obtaining or renewing a weapons carry license, as such term is defined in Code Section 16-11-125.1;

Compare all fingerprint and other identifying data received with those already on file and, whether or not a criminal record is found for a person, at once inform the requesting agency or arresting officer of such facts as may be disseminated consistent with applicable security and privacy laws and regulations. A log shall be maintained of all disseminations made of each individual criminal history including at least the date and recipient of such information;

Provide a uniform crime reporting system for the periodic collection, analysis, and reporting of crimes reported to and otherwise processed by any and all law enforcement agencies within the state, as defined and provided for in this article;

Periodically conduct audits of crime reporting practices of criminal justice agencies to ensure compliance with the standards of national and state uniform crime reporting systems and to ensure reporting of criminal arrests, dispositions, and custodial information;

Develop, operate, and maintain an information system which will support the collection, storage, retrieval, and dissemination of all crime and offender data described in this article consistent with those principles of scope, security, and responsiveness prescribed by this article;

Cooperate with all criminal justice agencies within the state in providing those forms, procedures, standards, and related training assistance necessary for the uniform operation of the center;

Offer assistance and, when practicable, instruction to all criminal justice agencies in establishing efficient local records systems;

Compile statistics on the nature and extent of crime in the state and compile other data related to planning for and operating criminal justice agencies, provided that such statistics do not identify persons, and make available all such statistical information obtained to the Governor, the General Assembly, and any other governmental agencies whose primary responsibilities include the planning, development, or execution of crime reduction programs. Access to such information by the latter governmental agencies will be on an individual, written request basis wherein must be demonstrated a need to know, the intent of any analyses, dissemination of such analyses, and any security provisions deemed necessary by the center;

Periodically publish in print or electronically statistics, no less frequently than annually, that do not identify persons and report such information to the Governor, the General Assembly, state and local criminal justice agencies, and the general public. Such information shall accurately reflect the level and nature of crime in the state and the operations in general of the different types of agencies within the criminal justice system;

Make available, upon request, to all local and state criminal justice agencies, all federal criminal justice agencies, and criminal justice agencies in other states any information in the files of the center which will aid these agencies in the performance of their official duties, including but not limited to final disposition of offenses; sentencing information and conditions; orders modifying an earlier disposition; orders relating to probation, including modification, tolling, completion of active probation supervision, termination, revocation, or completion of orders entered pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 8 of Title 42; and orders relating to parole, including modification, tolling, termination, and revocation. For this purpose the center shall operate on a 24 hour basis, seven days a week. Such information when authorized by the council may also be made available to any other agency of the state or political subdivision of the state and to any other federal agency upon assurance by the agency concerned that the information is to be used for official purposes only in the prevention or detection of crime or the apprehension of criminal offenders;

Cooperate with other agencies of the state, the crime information agencies of other states, and the Uniform Crime Reports and National Crime Information Center systems of the Federal Bureau of Investigation in developing and conducting an interstate, national, and international system of criminal identification, records, and statistics;

Provide the administrative mechanisms and procedures necessary to respond to those individuals who file requests to view their own records as provided for in this article and to cooperate in the correction of the central center records and those of contributing agencies when their accuracy has been successfully challenged either through the related contributing agencies or by court order issued on behalf of the individual;

Institute the necessary measures in the design, implementation, and continued operation of the criminal justice information system to ensure the privacy and security of the system. This will include establishing complete control over use and access of the system and restricting its integral resources and facilities to those either possessed or procured and controlled by criminal justice agencies as defined in this article. Such security measures must meet standards to be set by the council as well as those set by the nationally operated systems for interstate sharing of information;

Provide availability, by means of data processing, to files listing motor vehicle drivers’ license numbers, motor vehicle registration numbers, wanted and stolen motor vehicles, outstanding warrants, identifiable stolen property, and such other files as may be of general assistance to criminal justice agencies;

Receive and process fingerprints from the Supreme Court of Georgia Office of Bar Admissions for the purpose of determining whether or not an applicant for admission to the State Bar of Georgia has a criminal record. The processing shall include submission of fingerprints to the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and the Federal Bureau of Investigation for comparison to each of their respective files and data bases;

Provide The Council of Superior Court Clerks of Georgia the data set forth in Code Section 21-2-231, without charge and in the electronic format requested;

(16.1)

Provide at least quarterly to each clerk of superior court in this state, and upon request by any such clerk, a report detailing the number of open criminal charges, time expired restricted charges, and closed criminal charges for each county, respectively. Such report shall also be provided to any judge or prosecuting attorney of this state, upon request. Such report may be transmitted electronically or by mail in the discretion of the director of the center.

Notify the appropriate clerk of court that a defendant has completed his or her first offender sentence or was exonerated of guilt and discharged pursuant to subsection (g) of Code Section 42-8-60 within five days of such completion or exoneration;

Submit fingerprints obtained pursuant to subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of this subsection to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for retention under the rules established by the United States Department of Justice for processing and identification of records. Such fingerprints shall be searched by future submissions to the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the center shall send appropriate responses to submitting and subscribing entities;

Remove fingerprints obtained pursuant to subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of this subsection within ten days of being notified that an individual whose fingerprints were retained under such program is no longer employed by, volunteering for, placed by, or registered, licensed, or permitted by the participating agency or qualified entity. It shall also remove such fingerprints when such agency or qualified entity is no longer participating in such program. The center shall also notify the Federal Bureau of Investigation of such information; and

Be authorized to charge an annual subscriber fee not to exceed $500.00 to any entity which is not a state agency that desires to participate in the program described in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of this subsection.

Criminal justice agencies shall furnish upon written request and without charge to any local fire department in this state a copy, processed under purpose code “E”, of the criminal history record information of an applicant for employment.

The provisions of this article notwithstanding, information and records of children shall only be inspected and disclosed as provided in Code Sections 15-11-702 and 15-11-708. Such records and information shall be sealed or destroyed according to the procedures outlined in Code Sections 15-11-701 and 15-11-709.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1301, § 3; Ga. L. 1976, p. 617, § 5; Ga. L. 1980, p. 394, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1982, p. 952, §§ 2, 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 35; Ga. L. 1986, p. 513, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 35; Ga. L. 1998, p. 842, § 7; Ga. L. 2000, p. 20, § 21; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1549, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 334, § 2; Ga. L. 2007, p. 43, § 1/SB 62; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 4-44/HB 242; Ga. L. 2014, p. 451, § 11/HB 776; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 6B-2/SB 367; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 35/HB 737; Ga. L. 2017, p. 622, § 2/SB 95; Ga. L. 2018, p. 507, §§ 1A-1, 1A-2/SB 336; Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 13/SB 441.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “Code Section 21-2-231” for “Code Sections 15-12-40.1 and 21-2-231” in paragraph (a)(16).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, deleted “or” at the end of subparagraph (a)(1)(D), added “or” at the end of subparagraph (a)(1)(E), and added subparagraph (a)(1)(F); deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(16); substituted a semicolon for a period at the end of paragraph (a)(17); and added paragraphs (a)(18) through (a)(20).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added paragraph (16.1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 1/SB 441, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) The state’s current system for sharing criminal case data is not adequate to provide to all appropriately interested parties, including, but not limited to, law enforcement agencies and officers, courts, crime victims and other impacted individuals, housing providers, and employers, complete criminal case data;

“(2) One recent report indicates there may be as many as 7 million criminal charges without a final disposition indicated, and, of those, as many as 5.4 million criminal charges have languished for years;

“(3) Georgia’s citizens and businesses are harmed by incomplete criminal case data. For example, in thousands of cases, as a result of incomplete criminal case data, citizens’ employability and housing opportunities have been negatively impacted; and

“(4) A more uniform, modern system and framework for handling criminal case data will support the state in meeting its obligations to victims to keep them informed as their perpetrators make their way through the criminal justice system.

“(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that criminal case data be complete and accurately reported to the appropriate state data base and be accessible to state and local criminal justice agencies, employers, housing providers, victims, and all citizens.”

Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 2/SB 441, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Criminal Records Responsibility Act.’”

Law reviews.

For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 175 (2003).

For article, “Should Georgia Change Its Misdemeanor Arrest Laws to Authorize Issuing More Field Citations? Can Alternative Arrest Process Help Alleviate Georgia’s Jail Overcrowding and Reduce the Time Arresting Officers Expend Processing Nontraffic Misdemeanor Offenses?,” see
22 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (2005).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2018).

35-3-34.
Disclosure and dissemination of criminal records to private persons and businesses; resulting responsibility and liability of issuing center; provision of certain information to the FBI in conjunction with the National Instant Criminal Background Check System.

The center shall be authorized to:

Make criminal history records maintained by the center available to private persons and businesses under the following conditions:

Private individuals and businesses requesting criminal history records shall, at the time of the request, provide the fingerprints of the person whose records are requested or provide a signed consent of the person whose records are requested on a form prescribed by the center which shall include such person’s full name, address, social security number, and date of birth;

The center shall not provide records of arrests, charges, or sentences when an individual has been sentenced pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 8 of Title 42 and has been exonerated and discharged without court adjudication of guilt as a matter of law or pursuant to a court order, including records relating to such defendant’s bench warrants, failure to appear, and probation for such offense, except as specifically authorized by Code Section 42-8-63.1. The center shall not provide records of arrests, charges, or sentences when an individual has been sentenced as provided in Code Section 15-1-20, including records relating to such defendant’s bench warrants, failure to appear, and probation for such offense, except as specifically authorized by Code Section 42-8-63.1.

During the period of time after a defendant, who has been sentenced pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 8 of Title 42 but has not been exonerated and discharged without court adjudication of guilt as a matter of law or pursuant to a court order, has completed active probation supervision through the remainder of such sentence, the center shall not provide records of arrests, charges, or sentences except as specifically authorized by Code Section 42-8-63.1.

The center may provide records of arrests, charges, or sentences when an individual has been sentenced pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 8 of Title 42 but has not been exonerated and discharged without court adjudication of guilt as a matter of law or pursuant to a court order, as specifically authorized by Code Section 42-8-63.1, while a defendant is under active probation supervision for such offense, or as provided in a court order;

When the identifying information provided is sufficient to identify persons whose records are requested electronically, the center may disseminate electronically criminal history records of in-state felony convictions, pleas, and sentences without:

Fingerprint comparison; or

Consent of the person whose records are requested; and

The center shall not provide records of arrests, charges, or dispositions when access has been restricted pursuant to Code Section 3-3-23.1, 15-1-20, 16-13-2, 35-3-37, or 42-8-62.1; or

Make criminal history records of the defendant or witnesses in a criminal action available to counsel for the defendant upon receipt of a written request from the defendant’s counsel under the following conditions:

Such request shall contain the style of the case and the name and identifying information for each person whose records are requested. Such request shall be submitted to the center;

In cases where the court has determined the defendant to be indigent, any fees authorized by law shall be waived; and

Disclosure of criminal history information to the defendant’s counsel as provided in this paragraph shall be solely in such counsel’s capacity as an officer of the court. Any use of such information in a manner not authorized by law or the court in which such action is pending where the records were disclosed shall constitute a violation of Code Section 35-3-38; and

Charge fees for disseminating records pursuant to this Code section which will raise an amount of revenue which approximates, as nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs to the state for providing such disseminations.

In the event that an employment decision is made adverse to a person whose record was obtained pursuant to this Code section, the person will be informed by the business or person making the adverse employment decision of all information pertinent to that decision. This disclosure shall include information that a record was obtained from the center, the specific contents of the record, and the effect the record had upon the decision. Failure to provide all such information to the person subject to the adverse decision shall be a misdemeanor.

Neither the center, its employees, nor any agency or employee of the state shall be responsible for the accuracy of information nor have any liability for defamation, invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with the dissemination pursuant to this Code section and shall be immune from suit based upon any such claims.

Local criminal justice agencies may disseminate criminal history records, without fingerprint comparison or prior contact with the center, to private individuals and businesses under the same conditions as set forth in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section and may charge fees as needed to reimburse such agencies for their direct and indirect costs related to the providing of such disseminations.

(d.1)

Reserved.

(d.2)

When identifying information provided is sufficient to identify persons whose records are requested, local criminal justice agencies may disseminate criminal history records of in-state felony convictions, pleas, and sentences unless such records are restricted pursuant to Code Section 35-3-37, except as specifically authorized by Code Section 42-8-63.1, without:

(d.3)

No fee charged pursuant to this Code section may exceed $20.00 per person whose criminal history record is requested or be charged to any person or entity authorized prior to January 1, 1995, to obtain information pursuant to this Code section without payment of such fee.

(d.4)

The center shall place a high priority on inquiries from any nuclear power facility requesting a criminal history and shall respond to such requests as expeditiously as possible, but in no event shall a response be made more than two business days following receipt of the request.

Fingerprint comparison;

Prior contact with the center; or

Consent of the person whose records are requested.

Such information may be disseminated to private individuals and businesses under the conditions specified in subparagraph (a)(1)(B) of this Code section upon payment of the fee for the request and when the request is made upon a form prescribed by the center. Such agencies may charge and retain fees as needed to reimburse such agencies for the direct and indirect costs of providing such information and shall have the same immunity therefor as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section.

The Georgia Crime Information Center shall be authorized to provide criminal history records, wanted person records, and involuntary hospitalization records information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation in conjunction with the National Instant Criminal Background Check System in accordance with the federal Brady Handgun Violence Prevention Act, 18 U.S.C. Section 921, et seq.

The records of the Georgia Crime Information Center shall include information as to whether a person has been involuntarily hospitalized. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law and in order to carry out the provisions of this Code section and Code Section 16-11-172, the Georgia Crime Information Center shall be provided such information and no other mental health information from the involuntary hospitalization records of the probate courts concerning persons involuntarily hospitalized after March 22, 1995, in a manner agreed upon by the Probate Judges Training Council and the Georgia Bureau of Investigation to preserve the confidentiality of patients’ rights in all other respects. Further, notwithstanding any other provisions of law and in order to carry out the provisions of this Code section and Code Section 16-11-172, the center shall be provided information as to whether a person has been adjudicated mentally incompetent to stand trial or not guilty by reason of insanity at the time of the crime, has been involuntarily hospitalized, or both from the records of the clerks of the superior courts concerning persons involuntarily hospitalized after March 22, 1995, in a manner agreed upon by The Council of Superior Court Clerks of Georgia and the Georgia Bureau of Investigation to preserve the confidentiality of patients’ rights in all other respects. After five years have elapsed from the date that a person’s involuntary hospitalization information has been received by the Georgia Crime Information Center, the center shall purge its records of such information as soon as practicable and in any event purge such records within 30 days after the expiration of such five-year period.

The records of the center shall include information as to whether a person has been involuntarily hospitalized. In order to carry out the provisions of Code Section 16-11-129, the center shall be provided such information and no other mental health information from the records of the probate and superior courts ordering persons to be involuntarily hospitalized. With respect to probate court records, such information shall be provided in a manner agreed upon by the Probate Judges Training Council and the bureau. With respect to superior court records, such information shall be provided in a manner agreed upon by The Council of Superior Court Clerks of Georgia and the bureau. Such records shall be provided in a manner so as to preserve the confidentiality of patients’ rights in all other respects.

In order to carry out the provisions of Code Section 16-11-129, the center shall be provided information as to whether a person has been adjudicated mentally incompetent to stand trial or has been found not guilty by reason of insanity at the time of the crime. The clerk of court shall report such information to the center immediately but in no case later than ten days after such adjudication of mental incompetence or finding of not guilty by reason of insanity.

The council is empowered to adopt rules, regulations, and forms necessary to implement this Code section. The council shall promulgate regulations to ensure the identity, confidentiality, and security of all records and data provided in accordance with this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1301, § 3; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1401, § 2; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1243, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1981, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1988, p. 203, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1080, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1895, § 12; Ga. L. 1995, p. 139, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 633, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 35; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1206, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 840, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 613, § 2/SB 175; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 35/SB 465; Ga. L. 2006, p. 812, § 4/SB 532; Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 6-1/HB 1176; Ga. L. 2014, p. 599, § 1-13/HB 60; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 6B-3/SB 367; Ga. L. 2020, p. 753, § 2-4/SB 288.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subparagraph (a)(1)(D), inserted “3-3-23.1” and “16-13-2”; and added “unless such records are restricted pursuant to Code Section 35-3-37, except as specifically authorized by Code Section 42-8-63.1,” near the end of the introductory text of subsection (d.2).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, subsections (d.1) and (d.2), enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 633, § 2, were redesignated as subsections (d.2) and (d.3).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, “subparagraph (a)(1)(B)” was substituted for “subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a)” in the undesignated paragraph at the end of subsection (d.2).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2005, the single quotes were deleted from “Brady Handgun Violence Prevention Act” at the end of paragraph (e)(1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 139, § 7, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that no local ordinance which was in effect on March 22, 1995, shall be affected by Code Section 16-11-184 until January 1, 1996, at which time, unless enacted subsequent to March 22, 1995, as provided by that Code section, any such ordinance shall be of no further force or effect, and further provides that no ordinance or regulation attempting to regulate firearms in any manner shall be enacted by any county, city, or municipality after July 1, 1995.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 9-1/HB 1176, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that Part VI of this Act, which amended this Code section, shall become fully effective on July 1, 2013; provided, however, that for the purpose of preparing for implementation of Part VI of this Act, said part shall become effective on July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 599, § 1-1/HB 60, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Safe Carry
Protection Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For note on the 1994 amendment of this Code section, see 11 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 137 (1994).

For note on the 1995 amendment of this Code section and §

35-3-37

, see 12 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 118 (1995).

For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 179 (2003).

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 290 (2012).

For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 47 (2014).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).